Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2248SV (2) 91 ll/js S.F. 497 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. A board of supervisors shall 3 only discharge from employment the county manager, county 4 administrator, or similar county executive, even if a different 5 nomenclature is used to describe the position, by the adoption 6 of a motion or resolution upon a majority vote of the board. 7 Sec. 2. Section 364.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsection: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A city council shall only discharge 10 from employment the city manager, city administrator, or 11 similar city executive, even if a different nomenclature is 12 used to describe the position, by the adoption of a motion or 13 resolution upon a majority vote of the council. 14 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 15 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 16 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to new employment 17 contracts and the renewal of an existing employment contract 18 for a city manager, city administrator, or similar city 19 executive or a county manager, county administrator, or similar 20 county executive, even if a different nomenclature is used to 21 describe the position, entered into on or after the effective 22 date of this Act. 23